Illinois, session 104th, SB3161.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pesticide Act is amended by adding 5Section 14.5 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 60/14.5 new)7    Sec. 14.5. Paraquat ban. 8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Department" means the Department of Agriculture.10    "Paraquat" means any herbicide product containing paraquat 11dichloride or any other chemical form of paraquat.12    "Person" means any individual, firm, entity, partnership, 13exchange, association, trustee, receiver, corporation, or any 14other business organization or any member, officer, or 15employee of such a business organization.16    "Use" means the application, distribution, sale, or 17handling of paraquat within this State.18    (b) Beginning January 1, 2027, except as provided under 19subsections 4 and 5 of Section 14, the use of paraquat is 20prohibited in this State.21    (c) The Department, in consultation with the Department of 22Natural Resources and the Department of Public Health, may, by 23rule, allow the limited use of Paraquat for research purposes   SB3161- 2 -LRB104 19050 WRO 32495 b1only when such research is conducted under strict safety and 2reporting protocols established by the Department.3    (d) By January 1, 2027, all persons that use, distribute, 4or sell paraquat in this State shall submit a detailed report 5or reports to the Department, including, but not limited to, 6the following information:7        (1) the quantity of paraquat used, sold, or 8    distributed in the preceding year;9        (2) the geographic areas where paraquat is used;10        (3) the types of crops or applications for which 11    paraquat is used; and12        (4) any other information that the Department shall 13    require by rule or regulation.14    (e) Any person who violates the provisions of subsection 15(d) of this Section is subject to penalties as provided in 16Section 24.17    (f) The Department shall adopt any rules necessary to 18implement and administer this Section, including, but not 19limited to, rules establishing fines and penalties. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.